New York, session 2025-2026, A9453.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 27-f of the labor law, as added by a chapter of the 2 laws of 2025 amending the labor law relating to requiring employers to 3 include an opioid antagonist in first aid supplies required by federal 4 law, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5922-A and A. 2725-A, 5 is amended to read as follows: 6 § 27-f. Requiring first aid materials in a workplace to include an 7 opioid antagonist. 1. All employers that are federally mandated by the 8 United States Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law, 9 91-596) and safety and health standards promulgated thereunder to have 10 first aid supplies readily available for the treatment of all injured 11 employees must [include] have an opioid antagonist [in such first aid 12 supplies] available for use in providing first aid or emergency treat- 13 ment at the workplace. 14 2. For the purposes of this section, ["employer"] the following terms 15 shall have the following meanings: 16 (a) "Employer" includes any person, corporation, limited liability 17 company, or association employing any individual in any occupation, 18 industry, trade, business, or service. The term "employer" shall not 19 include [a governmental agency] the state, any political subdivision of 20 the state, a public authority or any other governmental agency or 21 instrumentality thereof. 22 (b) "Opioid antagonist" means the same as defined in section thirty- 23 three hundred nine of the public health law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05773-04-6 A. 9453 2 1 3. Administering an opioid antagonist pursuant to this section shall 2 be considered first aid or emergency treatment for purposes of section 3 three thousand-a of the public health law. 4 4. The commissioner shall promulgate regulations, in coordination with 5 the commissioner of health, to address the appropriate number of opioid 6 antagonists for workplaces based on the size of the workplace; the 7 training of personnel and use of such opioid antagonists; and any other 8 matter deemed necessary by such commissioner to effectuate this section. 9 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the labor law 10 relating to requiring employers to include an opioid antagonist in first 11 aid supplies required by federal law, as proposed in legislative bills 12 numbers S. 5922-A and A. 2725-A, is amended to read as follows: 13 § 2. This act shall take effect [on the one hundred eightieth day] one 14 year after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addi- 15 tion, amendment, and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 16 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 17 be made and completed on or before such effective date. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 19 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 20 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the labor law 21 relating to requiring employers to include an opioid antagonist in first 22 aid supplies required by federal law, as proposed in legislative bills 23 numbers S. 5922-A and A. 2725-A, takes effect.